es: Tecnología de radar: Banda ancha; Doppler; Impulso; Estado sólido; Otros
fr: Technologie radar: Haut débit; Doppler; Impulsion; État solide; Autre
lt-LT: Radaro technologija: Plačiajuostis; Dopleris; Impulsų; Kietojo kūno; Kita
nl: Radartechnologie: Breedband; Doppler; Puls; Solid-state; Andere
tr: Radar Teknolojisi: Geniş bant; Doppler; Nabız; Katı hal; Diğer
fi: Tutkatekniikka: Laajakaista; Doppler; Pulssi; Solid-state; Muu
da: Radarteknologi: Bredbånd; Doppler; Puls; Fast tilstand; Andet
zh-TW: 雷達技術: 寬頻; 多普勒; 脈衝; 固體狀態; 其他
ko: 레이더 기술: 광대역; 도플러; 펄스; 전고체; 기타
vi: Công nghệ radar: Băng thông rộng; Doppler; Xung; Thể rắn; Khác
de: Radartechnologie: Breitband; Doppler; Impuls; Festkörper; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 雷达技术: 宽带; 多普勒; 脉冲; 固态; 其他
pt-BR: Tecnologia de radar: Banda larga; Doppler; Pulso; Estado sólido; Outro
it: Tecnologia radar: Banda larga; Doppler; Rettangolare; Stato solido; Altro
sk-SK: Radarová technológia: Širokopásmové pripojenie; Doppler; Pulz; Pevný stav; Iné
pl: Technologia radarowa: Szerokopasmowa; Dopplerowska; Impulsowa; Solid-state; Inne
cs: Technologie radaru: Širokopásmové připojení; Doppler; Pulzní; Solid-state; Jiné
th: เทคโนโลยีเรดาร์: บรอดแบนด์; ดอปเปลอร์; รูปแบบคลื่น; โซลิดสเตต; อื่นๆ
ja: レーダー技術: ブロードバンド; ドップラー; パルス; ソリッドステート; その他
bg-BG: Радарна технология: Широколентов достъп; Доплер; Импулс; Твърдо състояние; Други
sv: Radarteknik: Bredband; Doppler; Puls; Fast tillstånd; Övrigt
ru: Радарная технология: Широкополосный; Доплеровский; Импульсный; Твердотельный; Другой
ro-RO: Tehnologie radar: Bandă largă; Doppler; Impuls; Stare solidă; Altele
en: Radar technology: Broadband; Doppler; Pulse; Solid-state; Other
el: Τεχνολογία ραντάρ: Ευρυζωνικό; Ντόπλερ; Σφυγμός; Στερεάς κατάστασης; Άλλο
hu: Radartechnológia: Szélessávú; Doppler; Impulzus; Szilárdtest; Egyéb
sl-SI: Tehnologija radarja: Širokopasovna povezava; Dopplerjev; Pulzni; Polprevodniški; Drugo
hr-HR: Radarska tehnologija: Širokopojasni; Doppler; Pulsni; Solid-state; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tecnologia de radar: Banda larga; Doppler; Pulso; Estado sólido; Outro
nb: Radarteknologi: Bredbånd; Doppler; Puls; Fast form; Annet